Vermont, session 2025-2026, H666.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as “Jessica’s Law.”
Sec. 2. 20 V.S.A. chapter 181 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 181. BENEFITS FOR THE SURVIVORS OF EMERGENCY
PERSONNEL
§ 3171. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Board” means the Emergency Personnel Survivors Benefit Review
Board.
VT LEG #385495 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.666
2026 Page 2 of 7
(2) “Child” means a natural or legally adopted child, regardless of age,
the deceased’s biological child, foster child, adoptive child, or stepchild; a
child for whom the deceased is listed as a parent on the child’s birth certificate;
a legal ward of the deceased; a child of the deceased’s spouse; or a child whom
the deceased had day-to-day responsibilities to care for and financially support
at the time of death or when the child was under 18 years of age.
(3) “Domestic partner” means an individual with whom the deceased
had an enduring domestic relationship of a spousal nature at the time of death,
provided that at the time of death the deceased and the domestic partner:
(A) had shared a residence for at least six consecutive months;
(B) were at least 18 years of age;
(C) were not married to or considered a domestic partner of another
individual;
(D) were not related by blood closer than would bar marriage under
State law; and
(E) had agreed between themselves to be responsible for each other’s
welfare.
(4) “Emergency medical personnel” has the same meaning as in
24 V.S.A. § 2651.
VT LEG #385495 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.666
2026 Page 3 of 7
(5) “Emergency personnel” means:
(A) firefighters as defined in subdivision 3151(3) of this title; and
(B) emergency medical personnel and volunteer personnel as defined
in 24 V.S.A. § 2651; and
(C) law enforcement officers.
(6) “Firefighter” has the same meaning as in subdivision 3151(3) of this
title.
(7) “Law enforcement officer” means a law enforcement officer:
(A) certified by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council pursuant to
section 2358 of this title; and
(B) who is employed by a county or municipality of the State.
(4)(8) “Line of duty” means:
(A) answering or returning from with respect to firefighters,
emergency medical personnel, and volunteer personnel:
(i) service in answer to a call of the department or service for a
fire or emergency or training drill, including going to and returning from a fire
or emergency or participating in a fire or emergency training drill; or
(B)(ii) similar service in another town or district to which the
department or service has been called for firefighting or emergency purposes;
and
VT LEG #385495 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.666
2026 Page 4 of 7
(B) with respect to law enforcement officers:
(i) service as a law enforcement officer in answer to a complaint
lodged with the department or in response to disorder, including going to,
returning from, and investigating or responding to the complaint or disorder;
(ii) service while participating in a training drill; or
(iii) service under orders from the department or in any emergency
for which the law enforcement officer serves as a law enforcement officer.
(5)(9) “Occupation-related illness” means a disease that directly arises
arises directly out of, and in the course of, service, including a heart injury or
disease symptomatic within 72 hours from the date of last service in the line of
duty, which shall be presumed to be incurred in the line of duty.
(6)(10) “Parent” means a natural or adoptive parent the deceased’s
biological parent, foster parent, adoptive parent, or stepparent; an individual
who is listed as a parent on the deceased’s birth certificate; a legal guardian of
the deceased; or an individual who had day-to-day responsibilities to care for
and financially support the deceased when the deceased was under 18 years of
age.
(11) “Spouse” includes an individual’s domestic partner or civil union
partner.
(7)(12) “Survivor” means a spouse, child, or parent of deceased
emergency personnel.
VT LEG #385495 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.666
2026 Page 5 of 7
(13) “Volunteer personnel” has the same meaning as in
24 V.S.A. § 2651.
§ 3172. EMERGENCY PERSONNEL SURVIVORS BENEFIT REVIEW
BOARD
(a)(1) There is created the Emergency Personnel Survivors Benefit Review
Board, which shall consist of the State Treasurer or designee, the Attorney
General or designee, the Chief Fire Service Training Officer of the Vermont
Fire Service Training Council or designee, and one member of the public to
represent the interests of emergency personnel appointed by the Governor for a
term of two years the Chair of the Law Enforcement Advisory Board or
designee.
(2) Survivors of emergency personnel, employed by or who volunteer
for the State of Vermont, a county or municipality of the State, or a nonprofit
entity that provides services in the State, who die in the line of duty or of an
occupation-related illness may, within 24 months after the death of the
emergency personnel or within a longer period due to extenuating
circumstances at the discretion of the Board, request that the Board award a
monetary benefit under section 3173 of this title chapter.
(3) The Board shall be responsible for determining whether to award
monetary benefits under section 3173 of this chapter. A decision to award
monetary benefits shall be made by unanimous vote of the Board and shall be
VT LEG #385495 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.666
2026 Page 6 of 7
made within 60 days after the receipt of all information necessary to enable the
Board to determine eligibility.
(4) The Board may request any information necessary for the exercise of
its duties under this section. Nothing in this section shall prevent the Board
from initiating the investigation or determination of a claim before being
requested by a survivor or employer of emergency personnel.
* * *
(d) Upon a Board decision to award a monetary benefit under this chapter,
the Treasurer shall make payment to the beneficiaries as described in
subsection (c) of this section. The Treasurer has up to one year from the date
the claim is received to disburse the funds.
* * *
(f) The member of the public appointed by the Governor shall be entitled to
per diem compensation authorized under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for each day spent
in the performance of his or her duties. [Repealed.]
§ 3173. MONETARY BENEFIT
(a) The survivors of emergency personnel who dies die while in the line of
duty or from an occupation-related illness may apply for a payment of
$80,000.00 from the State.
* * *
VT LEG #385495 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.666
2026 Page 7 of 7
§ 3175. EMERGENCY PERSONNEL SURVIVORS BENEFIT SPECIAL
FUND
(a) The Emergency Personnel Survivors Benefit Special Fund is
established in the Office of the State Treasurer for the purpose of the payment
of claims distributed pursuant to this chapter. The Fund shall comprise
appropriations made by the General Assembly, amounts transferred by the
Emergency Board when the General Assembly is not in session, and
contributions or donations from any other source. All balances in the Fund at
the end of the fiscal year shall be carried forward. Interest All interest earned
on the Fund balance shall remain in be credited to the Fund.
(b) In the event that the balance of the Fund is insufficient to pay monetary
benefits awarded by the Board when the General Assembly is not in session,
the Emergency Board may, pursuant to its authority under 32 V.S.A. § 133,
transfer into the Fund additional amounts necessary to pay the monetary
benefits.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385495 v.1